Mississippi, session 2026, HB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-1-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-1-19.  (1)  The Department of Public Safety, through the Office of Capitol Police, shall have jurisdiction relative to the enforcement of all laws of the State of Mississippi on the properties, from curb to curb, including adjoining streets, sidewalks and leased parking lots within the Capitol Complex, set forth in Section 29-5-2, the Governor's mansion, the Supreme Court Building, the Mississippi Department of Transportation Building and the Public Employees' Retirement System Building, and any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the Department of Public Safety would be responsible for such.  The Department of Public Safety shall, through any person or persons appointed by the commissioner, make arrests for any violation of any law of the State of Mississippi on the grounds of or within those properties.  The Department of Public Safety shall, in addition, enforce the provisions of this section and Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67, 29-5-73 through 29-5-75, and 29-5-81 through 29-5-95, and prescribe such rules and regulations as are necessary therefor.  The powers and duties related to the administration of Sections 29-5-57 through 29-5-67, 29-5-73 through 29-5-75, and 29-5-81 through 29-5-95 shall remain with the Department of Finance and Administration. (2)  Subject to the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Board of Trustees and the Department of Public Safety shall be authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Public Safety to supply the security personnel with jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on the property of the Board of Trustees located at the corner of Ridgewood Road and Lakeland Drive in the City of Jackson. (3)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Agriculture are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Public Safety to have jurisdiction and enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on the property of the Department of Agriculture located at 121 North Jefferson Street and the new Farmers Market Building located at the corner of High and Jefferson Streets in the City of Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi.  * * *It is the intent of the Legislature that In addition, the Department of Public Safety * * *will not may post any security personnel at such buildings, * * *but will and can provide regular vehicle patrols and responses to security system alarms. (4)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Agriculture are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Public Safety to have jurisdiction and enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on the property of the Department of Agriculture known as the "Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex" and any and all of its outlying buildings and property.  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Agriculture are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Public Safety to supply the security personnel to the Department of Agriculture with jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi on this property and any and all buildings on this property.  The Department of Public Safety is authorized to charge the Department of Agriculture a fee for security services provided for special events at the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex.  The fee charged will be commensurate with the cost associated with the Department of Public Safety providing those services. (5)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Revenue are authorized to enter into a contract for the Department of Public Safety to supply the security personnel with jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi at the Alcoholic Beverage Control facility and the Department of Revenue main office. (6)  (a)  The Department of Public Safety shall have primary jurisdiction relative to any other state or municipal law enforcement agency to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District created in Section 29-5-203; such enforcement shall be its primary function. The Department of Public Safety may, through any person or persons appointed by the Department of Public Safety, make arrests for any violation of any law of the State of Mississippi and violations of the City of Jackson's traffic ordinances or ordinances related to the disturbance of the public peace which occurs within the boundaries of the district and within the boundaries of the City of Jackson.  The Department of Public Safety may choose to present cases to either the District Attorney or the prosecuting attorneys designated by the Attorney General for prosecution of any violation of law that accrues or occurs, in whole or in part, within the boundaries established by Section 29-5-203. The jurisdiction of the Department of Public Safety granted under this subsection (6) shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and that of Hinds County, Mississippi, within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District created in Section 29-5-203. At any time and/or during any event necessitating the coordination of and/or utilization at multiple jurisdictions, as determined by the Chief of Capitol Police or the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall be the lead agency when the event occurs on property as defined herein that is owned or leased by the state as provided in subsection (1) of this section.  The jurisdiction and authority of the Department of Public Safety under this subsection (6) shall be in addition to any other jurisdiction and authority provided to the department under this section or any other law. (b)  The Department of Public Safety shall have jurisdiction relative to the enforcement of all laws of the State of Mississippi within the boundaries of the City of Jackson, Mississippi.  The Department of Public Safety may, through any person or persons appointed by the Department of Public Safety, make arrests for any violation of any law of the State of Mississippi which occurs within the boundaries of the City of Jackson.  The jurisdiction of the Department of Public Safety granted under this paragraph (b) shall not be primary and shall be concurrent with the jurisdiction of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and that of Hinds County, Mississippi. (c)  (i)  Written approval from the Chief of the Capitol Police or the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall be required before any event occurs which will take place on any street or sidewalk immediately adjacent to any building or property owned or occupied by any official, agency, board, commission, office or other entity of the State of Mississippi, or which can reasonably be expected to block, impede or otherwise hinder ingress thereto and/or egress therefrom.  The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this paragraph (c). (ii)  The Chief of the Capitol Police is authorized to issue solicitation permits in conformity with the Safe Solicitation Act, Sections 17-31-1 through 17-31-11, within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District. (d)  The Chief of the Capitol Police and/or the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, the Chief of the Jackson Police Department, and the Sheriff of Hinds County shall hold a regular meeting within the boundaries of the Capitol Complex Improvement District to address the concerns of the public.  Each meeting shall be called by the Chief of the Capitol Police; and the first meeting shall be called by October 15, 2023. (7)  The Department of Public Safety is authorized to enter into a contract with any county for the county to take custody of the misdemeanor offenders arrested under the authority granted under this section. (8)  All accrued personal leave earned pursuant to Section 25-3-93, accrued major medical leave earned pursuant to Section 25-3-95, accrued state compensatory leave earned pursuant to Section 25-3-92, and compensatory leave earned pursuant to the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) shall transfer from the Department of Finance and Administration to the Department of Public Safety for all employees transferred under this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.